Utah statutes.
26-36a-204.   Quarterly notice -- Collection.

(1) (a)  The division shall submit to the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services:

(i)  the payment methodology for the assessment imposed by this chapter; and

(ii)  if necessary, a waiver under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.68.

(b)  When the division receives notice of approval of the assessment and access payments under this chapter from the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the division shall, within 45 days of the notice from the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services, provide a hospital that is subject to the assessment notice of:

(i)  the approval of the assessment methodology from the Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services;

(ii)  the assessment rate;

(iii)  the hospital's discharges subject to the assessment; and

(iv)  the assessment amount owed by the hospital for the applicable fiscal year.

(2)  The initial quarterly installments of the assessment imposed by this chapter are due and payable if:

(a)  the division has provided notice of the annual assessment under Subsection (1); and

(b)  the division has made all the quarterly installments of the Medicaid inpatient hospital access payments that were otherwise due under Section 26-36a-205, consistent with the effective date of the approved state plan amendment.

(3)  After the initial quarterly installments of the Medicaid inpatient hospital access payments are made by the division, a hospital shall pay to the division the initial quarterly assessments imposed by this chapter within 10 business days.  Subsequent quarterly assessments imposed by this chapter shall be paid to the division within 10 business days after the hospital receives its Medicaid inpatient hospital access payment due for the applicable quarter under Section 26-36a-205.

